California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(B) Two members shall reside south of the southern boundary line of Marin County and a line extending due east from the easternmost point of Marin County located in San Pablo Bay and north of the boundary between Santa Barbara and San Luis Obispo Counties and a line extending due east from the easternmost point in that boundary line. The two members shall be selected from nominations submitted by the Central California Council of Divers, the Southern California Shellfish Assessment Program, the Northern California Shellfish Assessment Program, or by individuals or organizations that actively participate in the recreational abalone fishery, except that not more than one of the members selected shall be an active or former commercial abalone diver or involved in commercial seafood processing or marketing.

(C) Two members shall reside south of the boundary between Santa Barbara and San Luis Obispo Counties and a line extending due east from the easternmost point in that boundary line. The two members shall be selected from nominations submitted by the Greater Los Angeles Council of Divers, the San Diego Council of Divers, the Channel Islands Council of Divers, the Southern California Shellfish Assessment Program, or by individuals or organizations that actively participate in the recreational abalone fishery, except that not more than one of the members selected shall be an active or former commercial abalone diver or involved in commercial seafood processing or marketing.

(2) One member shall represent the department in enforcement activities and shall be selected from personnel in the Wildlife Protection Division.

(3) Two members shall be marine scientists who are or have been involved in abalone research at universities, state universities, or in state or federal programs. Not more than one of the persons shall be an officer or employee of the department.

(b) No member shall be involved in or profit from the culture for sale (commercial aquaculture) of abalone.

(c) The advisory committee shall meet at least once each calendar year to review proposals and recommend to the director projects and budgets for the expenditure of fees received pursuant to Section 7149.8. The committee may review progress reports and the results of projects funded under this article and make recommendations to the director regarding abalone resource management.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 787, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. COMMERCIAL FISHING [7600. - 9101.]



  CHAPTER 1. Generally [7600. - 8126.]



  ARTICLE 1. Application of Part [7600. - 7601.]

7600.

The provisions of this part apply to the taking and possession of fish for any commercial purpose. This part does not apply to activities governed under Division 12 (commencing with Section 15000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 131, Sec. 2.   Effective June 27, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

7601.

“Owner” or “vessel owner” means the person or persons designated as the registered owner of a vessel on a certificate of documentation issued by the United States Coast Guard or on a copy of the vessel registration issued by the vessel registration agency of the state where the owner is a resident. For purposes of this section, the vessel registration agency in California is the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 870, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.3. Commercial Fisheries Capacity Reduction Program [7630. - 7630.]

7630.

It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation establishing a comprehensive program to allow California groundfish fishermen to participate in any federally established buy-back program for the Pacific groundfish fishery.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 962, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Federal Regulation [7650. - 7655.]

7650.

As used in this article:

(a) “Act” means the Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and Management Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1801 et seq.).

(b) “Council” means the Pacific Fishery Management Council established pursuant to the act, or its successor agency.

(c) “Fishery” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1802(13) of Title 16 of the United States Code.

(d) “Joint committee” means the Joint Committee on Fisheries and Aquaculture created pursuant to Resolution Chapter 88 of the Statutes of 1981.

(e) “Optimum,” with respect to the yield from a fishery, has the same meaning as defined in Section 1802(28) of Title 16 of the United States Code.

(f) “Secretary” means the federal Secretary of Commerce.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 559, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.

Upon the preparation by the council, and the recommendation by the council to the secretary, of a fishery management plan or amendment thereto pursuant to the act, or upon the approval by the secretary of a fishery management plan, or amendment thereto, pursuant to the act, the director may do the following to conform state law or regulations of the commission to the fishery management plan, or amendment thereto, if the director finds that the action is necessary to achieve optimum yield in California and that it is necessary to avoid a substantial and adverse
 effect on the plan by that state law or the regulations in order to continue state jurisdiction pursuant to Section 1856 of the act:

(a) Adopt regulations that would make inoperative any statute or regulation of the commission, including, but not limited to, statutes or regulations regulating bag limits, methods of taking, and seasons for taking of fish for commercial purposes.

Any regulation adopted by the director pursuant to this subdivision shall specify the particular statute or regulation of the commission to be inoperative.

(b) Adopt regulations governing phases of the taking of fish for commercial purposes that are not presently regulated by statute or regulation of the commission.

(c) Adopt regulations governing phases of the taking of fish for commercial purposes
 that are presently regulated by statute or regulation of the commission, but only if the statutes or regulations are first made inoperative pursuant to subdivision (a) for the effective period of the regulations adopted by the director pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 870, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other section of this article or any other provisions of law, the director shall hold a public hearing or hearings in the area of the fishery under consideration after a recommendation by the council to the secretary of a fishery management plan or amendment thereto pursuant to the act, or after approval by the secretary of a fishery management plan or amendment thereto pursuant to the act. If the secretary approves a fishery management plan or amendment thereto which is substantially identical to the fishery management plan or amendment thereto which has been recommended by the
 council and the director has held a public hearing on the council’s recommended fishery management plan or amendment thereto, the director is not required to hold a second public hearing under this section after the approval by the secretary.

(b) The hearing shall be held not less than four days after the recommendation by the council to the secretary of a fishery management plan or amendment thereto or after the approval by the secretary of a fishery management plan or amendment thereto.

The director shall arrange the time and place of the hearing, shall provide adequate public notice and adequate notice to the appropriate standing policy committee of each house of the Legislature and to the joint committee, and shall convene the hearing at the time and place arranged.

(c) At the hearing or hearings, the director shall take evidence of
 the effects any proposed regulation would have on the state’s fishery resources, the commercial or recreational fishing industry, and the state’s ability to manage fishery resources in state waters.

(d) After the hearings, the director shall submit a written report to the Legislature which summarizes the reasons for the proposed regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1301, Sec. 3.   Effective September 20, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.2.

(a) The director may repeal or amend any regulation adopted pursuant to Section 7652 or any other regulation to conform the regulation to federal regulations pursuant to the act, if the director finds that this action is necessary to achieve optimum yield in California.

(b) Notwithstanding any other section of this article or any other provision of law, the director shall hold a public hearing or hearings in the area of the fishery under consideration before the director repeals or amends any regulation pursuant to this section. The director
 shall arrange the time and place of the hearing, shall provide adequate public notice and adequate notice to the appropriate standing policy committee of each house of the Legislature and to the joint committee, and shall convene the hearing at the time and place arranged.

(c) At the hearing or hearings, the director shall take evidence of the effects the proposed repeal or amendment would have on the state’s fishery resources, the commercial or recreational fishing industry, and the state’s ability to manage fishery resources in state waters.

(d) After the hearings, the director shall submit a written report to the Legislature which summarizes the reasons for the proposed repeal or amendment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1301, Sec. 5.   Effective September 20, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.3.

(a) The director shall not adopt, amend, or repeal any regulation pursuant to this article until the director has held one or more hearings and submitted a report to the Legislature pursuant to Section 7652.1 or 7652.2, whichever is applicable.

(b) The report to the Legislature shall be delivered or placed in the United States Postal Service addressed to the Chairperson of the Joint Committee on Fisheries and Aquaculture and to the chairperson of the appropriate policy committee of each house of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1301, Sec. 6.   Effective September 20, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.

Upon the adoption of any regulations pursuant to Section 7652, the director shall report to the Legislature which statutes or regulations of the commission need to be amended or repealed, and any regulations adopted by the director that need to be enacted as statutes, to conform state law to any fishery management plan, or amendment thereto, that has been approved by the secretary to avoid any substantial and adverse effect on such plan, or its amendments, by such state law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1160.)
-------------------------------------------

7654.

The Legislature finds and declares:

(a) That the actions taken by the federal Pacific Fishery Management Council have resulted in significant economic losses to California’s salmon and groundfish fisheries, have caused significant waste of fish, and have failed to manage and conserve fisheries for their optimum yield.

(b) That the California Salmon Fishery has been severely affected by regulations imposed by the Pacific Fishery Management Council and the federal Department of Commerce.

(c) That the membership of the Pacific Fishery Management Council has never included a commercial salmon troll fisherman and has at times lacked balance and representation from major fisheries subject to the fishery management plans of the council.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 7660 (as added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1323) by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

7655.

(a) It is the policy of the State of California that the state be represented on the Pacific Fishery Management Council by people who are knowledgeable about fisheries directly subject to the fishery management plans of the council. Nominations and appointments to the Pacific Fishery Management Council shall be a balanced representation of interested parties, including, but not limited to, representatives from the commercial salmon troll fishery, the groundfish fishery, the coastal pelagic species fishery, the seafood processing industry, the
 commercial passenger carrying fishing industry, nongovernmental environmental organizations, and marine scientists.

(b) When the Governor nominates persons for any seat on the Pacific Fishery Management Council, those individuals shall be knowledgeable of California’s fishery resources and its fishing industry. Further, the nominations may be made after consultation with fishery organizations and other interested parties, including parties representing the public’s interest in the fishery resources and marine environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 854, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.6. Salmon Management [7660. - 7662.]

7660.

As used in this article:

(a) “Advisory committee” means the Advisory Committee on Salmon and Steelhead Trout, established pursuant to Resolution Chapter 141 of the Statutes of 1983, except that there shall be two additional members appointed by the Joint Committee on Fisheries and Aquaculture after consultation with the Director of Fish and Game and the Fish and Game Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1686, Sec. 7.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

7662.

The department shall consult with the advisory committee and representatives of every user group known to the department on the progress being made in the development of the annual and long-term salmon management plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1686, Sec. 7.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.7. Vessel, Hull, and Machinery Loss Pooling [7690. - 7690.]

7690.

(a) Any person engaged in the business of licensed commercial fishing may enter into an arrangement with other authorized persons for the pooling of funds to pay claims or losses arising out of loss or damage to a vessel or machinery used in the business of commercial fishing and owned by a member of the pool.

A pool established pursuant to this section is not, and shall not be, subject to the Insurance Code and is not a member of the California Insurance Guarantee Association under Article 14.2
 (commencing with Section 1063) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code.

(b) The pool established pursuant to this section shall have initial pooled resources of not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) and the pool shall operate under generally acceptable accounting principles.

(c) All participating persons in any pool established pursuant to this section shall agree to pay premiums or make other mandatory financial contributions or commitments necessary to ensure a financially sound risk pool.

(d) For the purpose of this section, “person engaged in the business of licensed commercial fishing” and “authorized person” mean any natural person, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other person or entity engaged in the business of fishing for commercial purposes
 for which that person or its agents or employees are required to be licensed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 123.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [7700. - 7712.]

7700.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Reduction plant” means any plant used in the reduction or conversion of fish into fish flour, fishmeal, fish scrap, fertilizer, fish oil, or other fishery products or byproducts.

(b) “Packer” means any person canning fish or preserving fish by the common methods of drying, salting, pickling, smoking, cold packing, or vacuum packing.

(c) “Fish
 offal” means the heads, viscera, and other parts of fish taken off in preparing for canning, preserving, packing, and preparing for consumption in a fresh state.

(d) “Stamp,” except where otherwise specified, includes an electronic validation of privileges issued to the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 112, Sec. 62.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7701.

The commission may regulate and control fishing boats, barges, lighters or tenders, receptacles or vehicles containing fish, commercial fishermen, packers, reduction plants, plants where fish products are manufactured, and dealers in fish, or fishery products, insofar as necessary to insure the taking and delivery of fish and fishery products in a wholesome and sanitary condition to canning, packing or preserving plants, or to any plant where fishery products are manufactured, or to any fresh fish dealer, and to prevent deterioration and waste of fish.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

7702.

The department may enter and examine any canning, packing, preserving, or reduction plant, or place of business where fish or other fishery products are packed, preserved, manufactured, bought or sold, or board any fishing boat, barge, lighter, tender, or vehicle or receptacle containing fish, and ascertain the amount of fish received, or kind and amount of fishery products packed or manufactured and the number and size of containers or cans for fishery products purchased, received, used, or on hand and may examine any books and records containing any account of fish caught, bought, canned, packed, stored or sold.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

7702.1.

No sardines, anchovies, mackerel, or squid intended for or used in any cannery shall be unloaded from any vessel except at a weighing or measuring device approved by the Bureau of Weights and Measures. Such products shall be weighed by a public weighmaster licensed as an individual under the laws of this state and a receipt as to such weight shall be immediately issued by the weighmaster to the fisherman at the time of receipt of such products. Copies of such receipt shall be handled in the manner provided in Sections 8043 to 8047, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 246, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7703.

The commission may establish grades for different varieties of fish or fishery products, which grades shall be conformed to by persons who take or use sardines for bait or who deliver fish or other fishery products to packers or to fresh fish dealers. Every packer of fish, fish dealer, or manufacturer of fish products shall conform to the grades established by the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

7704.

(a) It is unlawful to cause or permit deterioration or waste of a fish taken in the waters of this state, or brought into this state, or to take, receive, or agree to receive more fish than can be used without deterioration, waste, or spoilage.

(b) Except as permitted by this code, it is unlawful to use a fish, except fish offal, in a reduction plant or by a reduction process.

(c) Except as permitted by this code or by regulation of the commission, it is unlawful to sell, purchase, deliver for a commercial purpose, or possess on a commercial fishing vessel registered pursuant to Section 7881, a shark fin or tail or part of a shark fin or tail that has been removed from the carcass. However, a thresher
 shark fin or tail that has been removed from the carcass and whose original shape remains unaltered may be possessed on a registered commercial fishing vessel if the carcass corresponding to the fin or tail is also possessed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 137.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7705.

All chutes or conveyors used to convey fish or fish offal to any receptacle, and all receptacles containing fish or fish offal to be used for reduction purposes, shall be so constructed and maintained that the fish or fish offal thereon or therein is at all times open to view and inspection.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

7706.

(a) A written complaint may be made to the commission against any person who violates Section 7700 to 7705, inclusive, 7707, 7708, or 8075 to 8080, inclusive, or any regulation adopted thereunder, by any person having information or knowledge of the violation. If the person charged in the complaint is found guilty of the offense charged, the commission may suspend, for a period not to exceed 90 days, any license issued by any state board or officer to that person to take, buy, sell, can, or preserve fish or fishery products. No other license shall be issued to that person during the period of suspension.

(b) The proceedings on a complaint shall be conducted at one of the commission’s regularly scheduled
 meetings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 137.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7707.

Any reduction plant in which any fish or any part thereof is used in violation of the provisions of Sections 7700 to 7706, inclusive, 7708, 8151, 8153 to 8157, inclusive, and 8075 to 8080, inclusive, of this code, or in violation of any regulation of the commission, is a nuisance. Whenever the existence of such nuisance is shown to the satisfaction of the superior court of the county in which the reduction plant is situated, by complaint filed in the name of the people of the State of California, the court may issue a temporary injunction to abate and prevent the continuance or recurrence of such nuisance. If the existence of a nuisance is established in such action, an order
 of abatement shall be entered as part of the judgment in the case, which order shall direct the closing, for 12 months, of the building or place where such nuisance was maintained, and, during such time, the building or place shall be and remain in the custody of the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

7708.

The commission may make and enforce such regulations as may be necessary or convenient for carrying out any power, authority, or jurisdiction conferred under this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

7709.

The commission may establish rules and regulations for the commercial taking of fish for educational and scientific purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

7710.

(a) If the director determines, based on the best available scientific information, or other relevant information that the director possesses or receives, and on at least one public hearing in the area of the fishery, that taking in a fishery is being conducted in a manner that is not sustainable, the director may order the closure of any waters or otherwise restrict the taking under a fishing license in state waters of that species. Any closure or restriction order shall be adopted by emergency regulation in accordance with Chapter 3.5
 (commencing with Section 11340) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The director shall bring to the attention of the commission within seven working days any regulations adopted pursuant to this section. Any regulations shall be effective for only 30 days unless the commission extends the closure or restriction under any authority it may have, or unless the director orders another closure or restriction, consistent with the requirements of subdivision (a).

(c) The department shall give notice of any hearing to be held pursuant to this section to the commission and its marine resources committee as far in advance of the hearing date as possible.

Nothing in this section or Section 7710.5 restricts any existing jurisdiction of the department with regard to the regulation of fisheries on the high seas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 483, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7710.1.

A closure or restriction under Section 7710, or the removal of a closure or restriction under Section 7710.5, may be appealed to the commission. The commission shall hear and decide the appeal within a time that is meaningful, taking into account the duration of the fishery and the economics of the fishery.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7710.5.

If, during the period that regulations adopted pursuant to Section 7710 are effective, the director determines, based on thorough and adequate scientific evidence and at least one public hearing in the area of the fishery, that any species or subspecies the taking of which was previously restricted, has recovered or additional evidence indicates that the resource is not in danger of irreparable injury, the director may remove the restriction on taking. Action to remove the restriction shall be by adoption of an emergency regulation in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

The director shall bring to the attention of the Legislature, within seven calendar days, any regulations adopted pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

7711.

(a) A person shall, upon request by an authorized agent or employee of the department, immediately relinquish, at no charge, fish or parts of fish caught or landed in California to the department for the purpose of collecting a biological sample.

(b) For purposes of this section, “person” means a person licensed pursuant to Section 7850 or a person licensed pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 8030).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 757, Sec. 3.   (SB 80)   Effective October 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7712.

Where a fishery is closed or restricted due to the need to protect a fishery resource, marine mammals, or sea birds, or due to a conflict with other fisheries or uses of the marine environment, it shall be the policy of the department and the commission, consistent with budgetary and personnel considerations, to assist and foster the development of alternative fisheries or alternative fishing gear for those commercial fishermen affected by the restrictions, closures, or resource losses, including, but not limited to, the issuing of experimental fishing permits pursuant to Section 1022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 477, Sec. 6.   (AB 1573)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Commercial Fishing Licenses [7850. - 7858.]

7850.

(a) Excepting persons expressly exempted under this code, no person shall use or operate, or assist in using or operating, any boat, aircraft, net, trap, line, or other appliance to take fish or amphibia for commercial purposes, and no person shall cause to be brought ashore, any fish or amphibia at any point in the state for the purpose of selling them in a fresh state or shall contribute materially to the activities on board the commercial fishing vessel, unless the person holds a commercial fishing license issued by the department.

(b) Any person not required under subdivision (a) to hold a commercial fishing license shall register their presence on board the commercial fishing vessel in a log maintained by the owner or
 operator of the vessel according to the requirements of the department.

(c) As used in this section, “person” means a natural person 16 years of age or greater. Any person, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or association may pay the fees for a license issued to any person.

(d) This article does not apply to the taking, transporting, or selling of live freshwater fish for bait by the holder of a live freshwater bait fish license issued pursuant to Section 8460.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 138.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7850.5.

Section 7850 does not apply to any person who is employed by the fish receiver to unload fish or fish products, or to load or unload food and supplies, on or from a commercial fishing boat at a dock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 80, Sec. 1.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

7851.

The application for a commercial fishing license shall contain a statement of the applicant’s sex, age, height, weight, the color of eyes and hair, and a statement as to whether or not the applicant is a citizen of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 936, Sec. 1.   Effective September 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

7852.

(a) The department shall issue a commercial fishing license to any resident who is 16 years of age or older, upon payment of a base fee of ninety-five dollars ($95) for each resident vessel crewmember or resident vessel operator.

(b) The department shall issue a commercial fishing license to any nonresident who is 16 years of age or older,
 upon payment of a base fee of two hundred eighty-five dollars ($285) for a nonresident vessel crewmember or nonresident vessel operator.

(c) The base fees specified in this section are applicable to the 2004 license year, and shall be adjusted annually thereafter pursuant to Section 713.

(d) The commission shall adjust the amount of the fees specified in subdivision (c), as necessary, to fully recover, but not exceed, all reasonable administrative and implementation costs of the department and the commission relating to those licenses.

(e) Nothing in this section affects any other provision of law relating to the employment of minors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 565, Sec. 23.   (SB 1148)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7852.1.

The department may refund the fees paid for a commercial fishing license or stamp, a commercial boat registration, or a commercial fishing permit to the estate of the deceased holder of the license, stamp, registration, or permit, if proof is provided by the estate that the death of the holder occurred prior to the opening of the season for which the license, stamp, registration, or permit was valid. The department may deduct from the refund an amount equal to the cost of issuing the refund, but not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25).

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 673, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7852.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a commercial fishing license, stamp, permit, or other entitlement for which there is a renewal deadline shall not be renewed after that deadline, except as follows:

(a) In addition to the base fee for the license, stamp, permit, or other entitlement, the department shall assess a late fee for any renewal the application for which is received after the deadline, according to the following schedule:

(1) One to 30 days after the deadline, a fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125).

(2) Thirty-one to 60 days after the deadline, a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(3) Sixty-one days or more after the deadline, a fee of five hundred dollars ($500).

(b) The department shall not waive the applicable late fee. The late fees specified in this section are applicable beginning in the 2008 license year, and shall be adjusted annually thereafter pursuant to Section 713.

(c) The department shall deny any application for renewal received after March 31 of the permit year following the year in which the applicant last held a valid permit for that fishery.

(d) An applicant
 who is denied renewal of a late application may submit a written appeal for renewal to the commission within 60 days of the date of the department’s denial. The commission, upon consideration of the appeal, may grant renewal. If the commission grants renewal, it shall assess the applicable late fee pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 279, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7852.25.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may deny the issuance or renewal of any licenses, permits, or other authorizations to take or possess fish for commercial purposes, or to conduct business involving fish, that are issued pursuant to this part or Division 12 (commencing with Section 15000), or the renewal thereof, if the applicant for that authorization or renewal has, within the preceding year, issued to the department a check that was dishonored by the bank upon which the check was drawn and the person has failed to reimburse the
 department for the amount due plus a fee of thirty dollars ($30) and any dishonored check charges incurred by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 936, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

7852.27.

At all times when engaged in any activity described in Section 7850 or Article 7 (commencing with Section 8030) for which a commercial fishing license is required, the licensee shall have in his or her possession, or immediately available to the licensee, a valid driver’s license or identification card issued to him or her by the Department of Motor Vehicles or by the entity issuing driver’s licenses from the licensee’s state of domicile. A current passport may be used in lieu of a valid driver’s license or identification card by a holder of a valid
 nonresident commercial fishing license issued pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7852. The licensee’s driver’s license, identification card or, if applicable, passport, shall be exhibited upon demand to any person authorized by the department to enforce this code or regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 116.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7852.4.

The owner of a vessel upon which a person who is at least 16, but less than 18, years of age, and who is licensed under Section 7852 is working shall obtain, and maintain in full force and effect at all times that a person is working on or about the vessel, a policy of insurance that provides indemnification to the person licensed under Section 7852 in case of accident or injury while working on or about the vessel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 431, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7853.

The commission may suspend or revoke the commercial fishing license of any licensee who operates a vessel in waters within the territorial jurisdiction of the State and approaches:

(a) Within 500 yards of any vessel owned or operated by the United States Government or any department or agency thereof, except when necessary to comply with the laws or rules of navigation governing the safe movement of vessels; or

(b) So close to any vessel owned or operated by the United States or any department or agency thereof and engaged in transporting naval or
 military equipment or personnel as to interfere with such transportation or to enable the observation thereof, except when necessary to comply with the laws or rules of navigation governing the safe movement of vessels.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

7854.

No license shall be suspended or revoked pursuant to Section 7853 until the filing of a complaint with the commission by any of the following:

(a) The commanding officer of a vessel owned or operated by the United States or any department or agency thereof.

(b) Any other officer of any such vessel who is authorized by his commanding officer to file such complaint.

(c) Any commanding officer of any military or naval activity affected by the licensee’s operation of a vessel, or any
 other officer of such activity authorized by such commanding officer to file a complaint.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

7855.

The proceedings to revoke or suspend a commercial fishing license shall be conducted at one of the commission’s regularly scheduled meetings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1244, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

7856.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, except as provided in subdivision (f) and except when prohibited by federal law, fish may be prepared for human consumption aboard a commercial fishing vessel only under the following conditions:

(a) The fish are taken under all existing commercial fishing laws and regulations and, except as provided in subdivision (f), the fish is of a species and size that can be lawfully taken under sportfishing regulations in the area where taken and are taken incidental to normal commercial fishing operations.

(b) The fish is separated from other fish and stored with other foodstuff for consumption by the crew and passengers aboard the vessel.

(c) The fish shall not be bought, sold, offered for sale, transferred to another person, landed, brought ashore, or used for a purpose other than consumption by the crew and passengers.

(d) (1) All fish shall be maintained in a condition that the species can be determined, and the size or weight can be determined if a size or weight limit applies, until the fish is prepared for immediate consumption.

(2) If the fish is filleted, a patch of skin shall be retained on each fillet as prescribed by the commission in the sportfishing regulations until the fish is prepared for immediate consumption.

(3) Fillets from fish possessed under sportfishing regulations shall be of the minimum length prescribed by commission regulations.

(e) The quantity of fish prepared shall not exceed the aggregate sportfishing bag limit for that fish applicable to the total number of crew members and passengers on board the vessel.

(f) Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, kelp bass, sand bass, spotted bass, yellowfin croaker, spotfin croaker, California corbina, and marlin, shall not be possessed aboard a commercial fishing vessel while that vessel is on a commercial fishing trip. Lobster, salmon, or abalone shall not be possessed aboard a commercial fishing vessel while that vessel is on a commercial fishing trip for preparation for human consumption pursuant to this section unless that lobster, salmon, or abalone is taken and possessed in compliance with all applicable laws pertaining to commercial fishing methods of take, licenses, permits, and size limits. Sturgeon or striped bass shall not be possessed aboard a
 commercial fishing vessel. A person shall not take or possess a fish on a commercial fishing vessel under a sportfishing license while that vessel is engaged in a commercial fishing activity, including going to or from an area where fish are taken for commercial purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 139.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7857.
